Nebraska, session 109, LB1137.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 28-631, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-631 (1) A person or entity commits a fraudulent insurance act if
the person or entity he or she:
(a) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive presents, causes
to be presented, or prepares with knowledge or belief that it will be
presented to or by an insurer, or any agent of an insurer, any statement
as part of, in support of, or in denial of a claim for payment or other
benefit from an insurer or pursuant to an insurance policy knowing that
the statement contains any false, incomplete, or misleading information
concerning any fact or thing material to a claim;
(b) Assists, abets, solicits, or conspires with another to prepare
or make any statement that is intended to be presented to or by an
insurer or person in connection with or in support of any claim for
payment or other benefit from an insurer or pursuant to an insurance
policy knowing that the statement contains any false, incomplete, or
misleading information concerning any fact or thing material to the
claim;
(c) Makes any false or fraudulent representations as to the death or
disability of a policy or certificate holder or a covered person in any
statement or certificate for the purpose of fraudulently obtaining money
or benefit from an insurer;
(d) Knowingly and willfully transacts any contract, agreement, or
instrument which violates this section;
(e) Receives money for the purpose of purchasing insurance and
converts the money to the person's own benefit;
(f) Willfully embezzles, abstracts, purloins, misappropriates, or
converts money, funds, premiums, credits, or other property of an insurer
or person engaged in the business of insurance;
(g) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive issues fake or
counterfeit insurance policies, certificates of insurance, insurance
-2-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
identification cards, or insurance binders;
(h) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive possesses fake
or counterfeit insurance policies, certificates of insurance, insurance
identification cards, or insurance binders;
(i) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive makes any false
entry of a material fact in or pertaining to any document or statement
filed with or required by the Department of Insurance;
(j) Knowingly and with the intent to defraud or deceive provides
false, incomplete, or misleading information to an insurer concerning the
number, location, or classification of employees for the purpose of
lessening or reducing the premium otherwise chargeable for workers'
compensation insurance coverage;
(k) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive removes,
conceals, alters, diverts, or destroys assets or records of an insurer or
person engaged in the business of insurance or attempts to remove,
conceal, alter, divert, or destroy assets or records of an insurer or
person engaged in the business of insurance;
(l) Willfully operates as or aids and abets another operating as a
discount medical plan organization in violation of subsection (1) of
section 44-8306; or
(m) Willfully collects fees for purported membership in a discount
medical plan organization but purposefully fails to provide the promised
benefits; or .
(n) Violates subdivision (13), (14), (15), or (16) of section
44-6604;
(2)(a) A violation of subdivisions (1)(a) through (f) of this
section is a Class III felony when the amount involved is five thousand
dollars or more.
(b) A violation of subdivisions (1)(a) through (f) of this section
is a Class IV felony when the amount involved is one thousand five
hundred dollars or more but less than five thousand dollars.
-3-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
(c) A violation of subdivisions (1)(a) through (f) of this section
is a Class I misdemeanor when the amount involved is five hundred dollars
or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars.
(d) A violation of subdivisions (1)(a) through (f) of this section
is a Class II misdemeanor when the amount involved is less than five
hundred dollars.
(e) For any second or subsequent conviction under subdivision (2)(c)
of this section, the violation is a Class IV felony.
(f) A violation of subdivisions (1)(g), (i), (j), (k), (l), and (m)
of this section is a Class IV felony.
(g) A violation of subdivision (1)(h) of this section is a Class I
misdemeanor.
(3) Amounts taken pursuant to one scheme or course of conduct from
one person, entity, or insurer may be aggregated in the indictment or
information in determining the classification of the offense, except that
amounts may not be aggregated into more than one offense.
(4) In any prosecution under this section, if the amounts are
aggregated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the amount
involved in the offense shall be an essential element of the offense that
must be proved beyond a reasonable doubt.
(5) A prosecution under this section shall be in lieu of an action
under section 44-6607.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) Insurer means any person or entity transacting insurance as
defined in section 44-102 with or without a certificate of authority
issued by the Director of Insurance. Insurer also means health
maintenance organizations, legal service insurance corporations, prepaid
limited health service organizations, dental and other similar health
service plans, discount medical plan organizations, and entities licensed
pursuant to the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act and the
Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act. Insurer also means an employer
-4-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
who is approved by the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court as a self-
insurer; and
(b) Statement includes, but is not limited to, any notice,
statement, proof of loss, bill of lading, receipt for payment, invoice,
account, estimate of property damages, bill for services, diagnosis,
prescription, hospital or medical records, X-rays, test result, or other
evidence of loss, injury, or expense, whether oral, written, or computer-
generated.
Sec. 2. Section 44-6604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-6604 For purposes of the Insurance Fraud Act, a person or entity
commits a fraudulent insurance act if the person or entity he or she:
(1) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive presents, causes
to be presented, or prepares with knowledge or belief that it will be
presented to or by an insurer, or any agent of an insurer, any statement
as part of, in support of, or in denial of a claim for payment or other
benefit from an insurer or pursuant to an insurance policy knowing that
the statement contains any false, incomplete, or misleading information
concerning any fact or thing material to a claim;
(2) Assists, abets, solicits, or conspires with another to prepare
or make any statement that is intended to be presented to or by an
insurer or person in connection with or in support of any claim for
payment or other benefit from an insurer or pursuant to an insurance
policy knowing that the statement contains any false, incomplete, or
misleading information concerning any fact or thing material to the
claim;
(3) Makes any false or fraudulent representations as to the death or
disability of a policy or certificate holder or a covered person in any
statement or certificate for the purpose of fraudulently obtaining money
or benefit from an insurer;
(4) Knowingly and willfully transacts any contract, agreement, or
-5-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
instrument which violates this section;
(5) Receives money for the purpose of purchasing insurance and
converts the money to the person's own benefit;
(6) Willfully embezzles, abstracts, purloins, misappropriates, or
converts money, funds, premiums, credits, or other property of an insurer
or person engaged in the business of insurance;
(7) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive issues or
possesses fake or counterfeit insurance policies, certificates of
insurance, insurance identification cards, or insurance binders;
(8) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive makes any false
entry of a material fact in or pertaining to any document or statement
filed with or required by the department;
(9) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive removes,
conceals, alters, diverts, or destroys assets or records of an insurer or
person engaged in the business of insurance or attempts to remove,
conceal, alter, divert, or destroy assets or records of an insurer or
person engaged in the business of insurance;
(10) Knowingly and with the intent to defraud or deceive provides
false, incomplete, or misleading information to an insurer concerning the
number, location, or classification of employees for the purpose of
lessening or reducing the premium otherwise chargeable for workers'
compensation insurance coverage;
(11) Willfully operates as or aids and abets another operating as a
discount medical plan organization in violation of subsection (1) of
section 44-8306; or
(12) Willfully collects fees for purported membership in a discount
medical plan but purposefully fails to provide the promised benefits; .
(13) Knowingly represents themselves to be a public adjuster without
having met the requirements of licensure under the Public Adjusters
Licensing Act;
(14) Knowingly conducts business for which a license is required
-6-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
under the Public Adjuster Licensing Act without a license;
(15) Willfully provides a rebate in violation of subsection (1) of
section 44-8604 or violates subsection (13) of section 44-9217; or
(16) Knowingly presents, causes to be presented, or prepares with
knowledge or belief that it will be presented, to or by an insured, an
insurer, an insurance producer, or a premium finance company in
connection with an insurance transaction or premium finance transaction,
a statement, an estimate, an invoice, a bid, a proposal, a proof of loss,
or any other document that misrepresents the scope of damages or costs of
repairs associated with a property insurance claim.
Sec. 3. Section 44-8602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-8602 For purposes of the Insured Homeowners Protection Act:
(1) Post-loss assignment means any contract or agreement whereby a
homeowner, after property damage, transfers, sells, or assigns any or all
of their insurance claim rights under a property and casualty insurance
policy, including, but not limited to, payment and negotiations;
(2) (1) Residential contractor means a person in the business of
contracting or offering to contract with an owner or possessor of
residential real estate to:
(a) Perform Repair or replace a roof system or perform any other
exterior repair, replacement, construction, or reconstruction work on
residential real estate;
(b) Perform interior or exterior cleanup services on residential
real estate; or
(c) Arrange for, manage, or process the work referred to in
subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of this section; or
(d) Serve as a representative, agent, or assignee of the owner or
possessor of residential real estate;
(3) (2) Residential real estate means a new or existing building,
including a detached garage, constructed for habitation by at least one
-7-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
but no more than four families; and
(4) (3) Roof system means and includes roof coverings, roof
sheathing, roof weatherproofing, and insulation.
Sec. 4. Section 44-8603, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-8603 (1) A person who has entered into a written contract with a
residential contractor to provide goods or services to be paid from the
proceeds of a property and casualty insurance policy may cancel the
contract prior to midnight on the later of the fifth third business day
after the person has (a) entered into the written contract or (b)
received written notice from the person's insurer that all or part of the
claim or contract is not a covered loss under the insurance policy.
Cancellation shall be evidenced by the person giving written notice of
the cancellation to the residential contractor at the address of the
residential contractor's place of business as stated in the contract.
Written notice of cancellation may be given by delivering or mailing a
signed and dated copy of the written notice of cancellation to the
residential contractor at the address of the residential contractor's
place of business as stated in the contract. The notice of cancellation
shall include a copy of the written notice from the person's insurer, if
applicable, to the effect that all or part of the claim or contract is
not a covered loss under the insurance policy. Notice of cancellation
given by mail shall be effective upon deposit in the United States mail,
postage prepaid, if properly addressed to the residential contractor.
Notice of cancellation may be provided on the form given to the insurer
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section or in another is not required
to be in any particular form. Notice and is sufficient if the notice
indicates, by any form of written expression, the intent of the insured
not to be bound by the contract.
(2) Before entering a contract as provided in subsection (1) of this
section, the residential contractor shall:
-8-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
(a) Furnish the insured a statement in boldface type of a minimum
size of ten points, in substantially the following form:
'YOU MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT AT ANY TIME BEFORE MIDNIGHT ON THE
FIFTH BUSINESS DAY AFTER YOU HAVE SIGNED THIS CONTRACT OR YOU HAVE
RECEIVED WRITTEN NOTIFICATION FROM YOUR INSURER THAT ALL OR ANY PART OF
THE CLAIM OR CONTRACT IS NOT A COVERED LOSS UNDER THE INSURANCE POLICY.
THIS RIGHT TO CANCEL IS IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER RIGHTS OF CANCELLATION
WHICH MAY BE FOUND IN STATE OR FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATION. SEE ATTACHED
NOTICE OF CANCELLATION FORM FOR AN EXPLANATION OF THIS RIGHT'; and
(b) Furnish each insured a fully completed form in duplicate,
captioned 'NOTICE OF CANCELLATION,' which shall be attached to the
contract but easily detachable, and which shall contain in boldface type
of a minimum size of ten points, the following statement:
'NOTICE OF CANCELLATION'
IF YOU ARE NOTIFIED BY YOUR INSURER THAT ALL OR ANY PART OF THE
CLAIM OR CONTRACT IS NOT A COVERED LOSS UNDER THE INSURANCE POLICY, YOU
MAY CANCEL THE CONTRACT BY MAILING OR DELIVERING A SIGNED AND DATED COPY
OF THIS CANCELLATION NOTICE OR ANY OTHER WRITTEN NOTICE TO (NAME OF
CONTRACTOR) AT (ADDRESS OF CONTRACTOR'S PLACE OF BUSINESS) AT ANY TIME
PRIOR TO MIDNIGHT ON THE FIFTH BUSINESS DAY AFTER YOU RECEIVED SUCH
NOTICE FROM YOUR INSURER.
I HEREBY CANCEL THIS TRANSACTION
(DATE)
(INSURED'S SIGNATURE).
(3) (2) Within ten days after a contract to provide goods or
services to be paid from the proceeds of a property and casualty
insurance policy has been canceled by notification pursuant to this
section, the residential contractor shall tender to the person canceling
the contract any payments, partial payments, or deposits made by the
person and any note or other evidence of indebtedness, except that if the
residential contractor has provided any goods or services agreed to by
-9-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
such person in writing to be necessary to prevent damage to the premises,
the residential contractor shall be entitled to be paid the reasonable
value of such goods or services. Any provision in a contract to provide
goods or services to be paid from the proceeds of a property and casualty
insurance policy that requires the payment of any fee which is not for
such goods or services shall not be enforceable against any person who
has canceled a contract pursuant to this section.
Sec. 5. Section 44-8604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-8604 (1) A residential contractor shall not promise to rebate any
portion of an insurance deductible as an inducement to the sale of goods
or services. A promise to rebate any portion of an insurance deductible
includes granting any allowance or offering any discount against the fees
to be charged or paying an insured or a person directly or indirectly
associated with the residential real estate any form of compensation,
except for any item of nominal value.
(2) Neither a residential contractor nor a person acting as a public
adjuster under the Public Adjuster Licensing Act, shall solicit or accept
a post-loss assignment, except that a licensed public adjuster may accept
an assignment to the extent of its public adjuster fee. A post-loss
assignment is against public policy and is void and any contract,
agreement, or written instrument entered into in violation of this
subsection shall be void and unenforceable.
(3) A residential contractor shall not represent or negotiate, or
offer or advertise to represent or negotiate, on behalf of an owner or
possessor of residential real estate on any insurance claim. This
subsection shall not apply to a public adjuster licensed under the Public
Adjuster Licensing Act.
Sec. 6. Section 44-8605, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-8605 (1) A post-loss assignment of rights or benefits to a
-10-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
residential contractor under a property and casualty insurance policy
insuring residential real estate shall comply with the following:
(a) The assignment may authorize a residential contractor to be
named as a copayee for the payment of benefits under a property and
casualty insurance policy covering residential real estate;
(b) The assignment shall be provided to the insurer of the
residential real estate within five business days after execution;
(c) The assignment shall include a statement that the residential
contractor has made no assurances that the claimed loss will be fully
covered by an insurance contract and shall include the following notice
in capitalized fourteen-point type:
YOU ARE AGREEING TO ASSIGN CERTAIN RIGHTS YOU HAVE UNDER YOUR
INSURANCE POLICY. WITH AN ASSIGNMENT, THE RESIDENTIAL CONTRACTOR SHALL BE
ENTITLED TO PURSUE ANY RIGHTS OR REMEDIES THAT YOU, THE INSURED
HOMEOWNER, HAVE UNDER YOUR INSURANCE POLICY. PLEASE READ AND UNDERSTAND
THIS DOCUMENT BEFORE SIGNING.
THE INSURER MAY ONLY PAY FOR THE COST TO REPAIR OR REPLACE DAMAGED
PROPERTY CAUSED BY A COVERED PERIL, SUBJECT TO THE TERMS OF THE POLICY.
(d) The assignment shall not impair the interest of a mortgagee
listed on the declarations page of the property and casualty insurance
policy which is the subject of the assignment; and
(e) The assignment shall not prevent or inhibit an insurer from
communicating with the named insured or mortgagee listed on the
declarations page of the property and casualty insurance policy that is
the subject of the assignment.
(2) The Department of Insurance shall strictly enforce the
provisions of subdivision (13) of section 44-1540, which requires
insurers to provide a named insured a reasonable and accurate explanation
of the basis for the denial of a claim or an offer of a compromise
settlement.
Sec. 7. Section 44-9204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-11-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
amended to read:
44-9204 (1) A person shall not act operate as or represent that such
person is a public adjuster in this state or solicit or negotiate a
contract to act as a public adjuster unless such person is licensed as a
public adjuster in accordance with the Public Adjusters Licensing Act.
(2) A public adjuster shall not misrepresent to any insured that
such public adjuster is an adjuster representing an insurer in any
capacity, including acting as an employee of the insurer or acting as an
independent adjuster unless so appointed by an insurer in writing to act
on behalf of the insurer for that specific claim or purpose. A public
adjuster is prohibited from charging any insured a fee when appointed by
the insurer and the appointment is accepted by the public adjuster.
(3) A public adjuster shall not, directly or indirectly, solicit, or
enter into, an agreement for the repair or replacement of damaged
property on which such public adjuster has engaged to adjust or settle
claims for losses or damages of the insured.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, licensing as a
public adjuster shall not be required for:
(a) An attorney admitted to practice in this state, when acting in
the attorney’s professional capacity as an attorney;
(b) A person who negotiates or settles claims arising under a life
or health insurance policy or an annuity contract;
(c) A person employed only for the purpose of obtaining facts
surrounding a loss or furnishing technical assistance to a licensed
public adjuster, including, but not limited to, a photographer,
estimator, private investigator, engineer, or handwriting expert;
(d) A licensed health care provider, or an employee of a licensed
health care provider, who prepares or files a health claim form on behalf
of a patient; or
(e) A person who settles subrogation claims between insurers.
Sec. 8. Section 44-9214, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-12-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
amended to read:
44-9214 (1) Public adjusters shall ensure that all contracts for
their services are in writing and contain the following terms:
(a) Legible full name of the public adjuster signing the contract,
as specified in director records;
(b) Home state, business address, and telephone number;
(c) Public adjuster license number;
(d) Title of "Public Adjuster Contract";
(e) Insured’s full name, street address, insurer name, and insurance
policy number, if known or upon notification;
(f) Description of the loss and its location, if applicable;
(g) Description of services to be provided to the insured;
(h) Signatures of the public adjuster and the insured;
(i) Date contract was signed by the public adjuster and date the
contract was signed by the insured;
(j) Attestation language stating that the public adjuster is fully
bonded pursuant to state law; and
(k) The specific amount of compensation, including, but not limited
to, the full salary, fee, commission, or other consideration the public
adjuster is to receive for services.
(2)(a) The contract may specify that the public adjuster shall be
named as a co-payee on an insurer’s payment of a claim.
(b) If the compensation is based on a share of the insurance
settlement, the exact percentage shall be specified.
(c) Initial expenses to be reimbursed to the public adjuster from
the proceeds of the claim payment shall be specified by type and the
dollar estimates shall be set forth in the contract. Any additional
expenses shall be approved in writing by the insured.
(d) Compensation provisions in a public adjuster contract shall not
be redacted in any copy of the contract provided to the director.
(3) If the insurer, not later than seventy-two hours after the date
-13-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
on which the loss is reported to the insurer, either pays or commits in
writing to pay to the insured the policy limit of the insurance policy,
the public adjuster shall:
(a) Not receive a commission that consists of a percentage of the
total amount paid by an insurer to resolve a claim;
(b) Inform the insured that the loss recovery amount might not be
increased by the insurer; and
(c) Be entitled only to reasonable compensation from the insured for
services provided by the public adjuster on behalf of the insured, based
on the time spent on a claim and expenses incurred by the public
adjuster, until the claim is paid or the insured receives a written
commitment to pay from the insurer.
(4) A public adjuster contract may not contain any contract term
that:
(a) Allows a percentage fee to be collected by the public adjuster
when money is due from an insurer, but not paid, or that allows a public
adjuster to collect the entire fee from the first check issued by an
insurer, rather than as a percentage of each check issued by an insurer;
(b) Requires the insured to authorize an insurer to issue a check
only in the name of the public adjuster;
(c) Imposes collection costs or late fees; or
(d) Precludes a public adjuster from pursuing civil remedies.
(5) Prior to the signing of the contract the public adjuster shall
provide the insured with a separate disclosure document regarding the
claim process that states:
(a) Property insurance policies obligate the insured to present a
claim to his or her insurer for consideration;
(b) There are three types of adjusters that could be involved in the
claim process. The definitions of the three types are as follows:
(i) Company adjuster means an insurance adjuster who is an employee
of an insurer. He or she represents the interest of the insurer, is paid
-14-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
by the insurer, and will not charge the insured a fee;
(ii) Independent adjuster means an insurance adjuster who is hired
on a contract basis by an insurer to represent the interest of the
insurer in the settlement of the claim. He or she is paid by the insurer
and will not charge the insured a fee; and
(iii) Public adjuster means an insurance adjuster who does not work
for any insurer. He or she works for the insured to assist in the
preparation, presentation, and settlement of the claim. The insured hires
a public adjuster by signing a contract agreeing to pay a fee or
commission based on a percentage of the settlement or other method of
compensation;
(c) The insured is not required to hire a public adjuster to help
the insured meet the insured’s obligations under the policy, but has the
right to do so;
(d) The insured has the right to initiate direct communications with
the insured’s attorney, the insurer, the company adjuster, and the
insurer’s attorney, or any other person regarding the settlement of the
insured’s claim;
(e) The public adjuster is not a representative or employee of the
insurer; and
(f) The salary, fee, commission, or other consideration to be paid
to a public adjuster is the obligation of the insured, not the insurer.
(6) The contract shall be executed in duplicate to provide an
original contract to the public adjuster and an original contract to the
insured. The original contract retained by the public adjuster shall be
available at all times for inspection without notice by the department.
(7) The public adjuster shall provide the insurer a notification
letter, which has been signed by the insured, authorizing the public
adjuster to represent the insured’s interest. The insurer, upon receipt
of a notification letter, shall verify the public adjuster holds a valid
license with the department.
-15-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
(8) The public adjuster shall give the insured written notice of the
insured’s rights as provided in this section.
(9) The insured has the right to rescind the contract within three
business days after the date the contract was signed. The rescission
shall be in writing and mailed or delivered to the public adjuster at the
address in the contract within the three-business-day period.
(10) If the insured exercises the right to rescind the contract,
anything of value given by the insured under the contract will be
returned to the insured within fifteen days following the receipt by the
public adjuster of the rescission notice.
(11) The director may require a public adjuster to file a contract
with the department in a manner prescribed by the director.
Sec. 9. Section 44-9217, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-9217 (1) A public adjuster shall serve with objectivity and
complete loyalty to the interest of the insured and shall, in good faith,
render to the insured such information, counsel, and service, as within
the knowledge, understanding, and opinion of such public adjuster will
best serve the insurance claim needs and interest of the insured.
(2) A public adjuster or a residential contractor as defined in
section 44-8602 shall not solicit, nor attempt to solicit, an insured
during the progress of a loss-producing occurrence, as defined in the
insured’s insurance contract, or during a fire event while the fire
department or representatives of the fire department are physically on
site at the damaged premises.
(3) A public adjuster shall not permit an unlicensed employee or
representative of the public adjuster to conduct business for which a
license is required under the Public Adjusters Licensing Act.
(4) A public adjuster shall not have a direct or indirect financial
interest in any aspect of the claim, other than the salary, fee,
commission, or other consideration established in the written contract
-16-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
with the insured. Direct or indirect financial interest includes, but is
not limited to, ownership of, employment by, or other consideration
received from any business entity or individual that performs any work
pertaining to damage related to the insured loss.
(5) A public adjuster shall not acquire any interest in salvage of
property subject to the contract with the insured unless the public
adjuster obtains written permission from the insured after settlement of
the claim with the insurer.
(6) A public adjuster shall abstain from referring or directing the
insured to obtain needed repairs or services in connection with a loss
from any person:
(a) With whom the public adjuster has a direct or indirect financial
interest; or
(b) From whom the public adjuster may receive direct or indirect
compensation or other consideration for the referral.
(7) A public adjuster shall not undertake the adjustment of any
claim if such public adjuster is not competent and knowledgeable as to
the terms and conditions of the insurance coverage or if the loss or
coverage otherwise exceeds the current expertise of the public adjuster.
(8) A public adjuster shall not knowingly make any false oral or
written material statements regarding any person engaged in the business
of insurance to any insured client or potential insured client.
(9) A public adjuster, while so licensed pursuant to the Public
Adjusters Licensing Act, shall not represent or act as a company adjuster
or independent adjuster in any circumstance.
(10) A public adjuster shall not enter into a contract or accept a
power of attorney that vests in such public adjuster the effective
authority to choose the persons who shall perform repair work.
(11) A public adjuster shall not agree to any loss settlement
without the knowledge and consent of the insured.
(12) A public adjuster shall not advertise or infer damage unless an
-17-

LB1137 LB1137
2026 2026
inspection of the property has been completed.
(13) A public adjuster shall not offer to pay an insured's
deductible, or claim the insured's deductible will be waived, as an
inducement to using the services of a public adjuster.
Sec. 10. Original sections 28-631, 44-6604, 44-8602, 44-8603,
44-8604, 44-8605, 44-9204, 44-9214, and 44-9217, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, are repealed.
-18-